Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 10
ABSENTEE VOTING

1-13.5-1001. When absentee electors may vote.

Any eligible elector of a local government may cast an absentee voter's ballot at the election in the manner provided in sections 1-13.5-1002 to 1-13.5-1007.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 38, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1002. Application for absentee voter's ballot - delivery - list.

Requests for an application for an absentee voter's ballot may be made orally or in writing. The application may be in the form of a letter. The application may request that the applicant be added to the permanent absentee voter list for the local government.
(1) (a) (I) Requests for an application for an absentee voter's ballot may be made orally or in writing. The application may be in the form of a letter. The application may request that the applicant be added to the permanent absentee voter list for the local government.

Applications for absentee voters' ballots shall be filed in writing and be personally signed by the applicant or a family member related by blood, marriage, civil union, or adoption to the applicant. If the applicant is unable to sign the application, the applicant shall make such applicant's mark on the application, which must be witnessed in writing by another person.

The application must be filed with the designated election official not later than the close of business on the Tuesday immediately preceding the next local government election in which the absentee voter wishes to vote by absentee voter's ballot.

Upon timely receipt of an application for an absentee voter's ballot, the designated election official receiving it shall examine the records of the county clerk and recorder or county assessor, as appropriate, to ascertain whether or not the applicant is registered and lawfully entitled to vote as requested.

If the person is found to be so entitled, the designated election official shall deliver, as soon as practicable but not more than seventy-two hours after the blank ballots have been received, an official absentee voter's ballot, an identification return envelope with the affidavit or the envelope properly filled in as to address of residence as shown by the records of the county clerk and recorder, and an instruction card. The identification return envelope must state "Do not forward. Address correction requested." or any other similar statement that is in accordance with United States postal service regulations. The delivery must be made to the applicant either personally in the designated election official's office or by mail to the mailing address given in the application for an official absentee voter's ballot.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 38, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1)(b) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1268, § 9, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1003. Application for permanent absentee voter status.

Any eligible elector of a political subdivision may apply for permanent absentee voter status. The application for permanent absentee voter status must be made in writing or by facsimile using an application form or letter furnished by the designated election official of the political subdivision. The application must contain the same information submitted in connection with an application for an absentee voter's ballot pursuant to section 1-13.5-1002.

Upon receipt of an application for permanent absentee voter status, the designated election official shall process the application in the same manner as an application for an absentee voter's ballot. If the designated election official determines that the applicant is an eligible elector, the designated election official shall place the eligible elector's name on the list maintained by the political subdivision pursuant to section 1-13.5-1004 of those eligible electors to whom an absentee voter's ballot is mailed every time there is an election conducted by the political subdivision for which the eligible elector has requested permanent absentee voter status.

If there is no designated election official presently appointed in the local government, the secretary of the local government shall process the application for permanent absentee status in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 39, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(3) added, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1269, § 10, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1004. List of absentee voters' ballots - removal from list.

The designated election official shall keep a list of names of eligible electors who have applied for absentee voters' ballots and of those permanent absentee voters placed on the list pursuant to section 1-13.5-1003 (2), with the date on which each application was made, the date on which the absentee voter's ballot was sent, and the date on which each absentee voter's ballot was returned. If an absentee voter's ballot is not returned, or if it is rejected and not counted, that fact must be noted on the list. The list is open to public inspection under proper regulations.

An eligible elector whose name appears on the list as a permanent absentee voter must remain on the list and must be mailed an absentee voter's ballot for each election conducted by the political subdivision for which the eligible elector has requested permanent absentee voter status.

An eligible elector must be deleted from the permanent absentee voter list if:

The eligible elector notifies the designated election official that he or she no longer wishes to vote by absentee voter's ballot;

The absentee voter's ballot sent to the eligible elector is returned to the designated election official as undeliverable;

The eligible elector has been deemed "Inactive" pursuant to section 1-2-605; or

The person is no longer eligible to vote in the political subdivision.

The designated election official shall keep a list of the names of eligible electors applying for an absentee voter's ballot, the number appearing on the stub of the ballot issued to such eligible elector, and the date the ballot is delivered or mailed. This information may be recorded on the registration record or registration list before the registration book or list is delivered to the election judges. A separate list of the eligible electors who have received absentee voter's ballots must be delivered to the election judges in the polling place designated for counting absentee voter's ballots, or, if the designated election official elects to deliver absentee voters' envelopes received from electors to the election judges of such polling place, as provided by section 1-13.5-1006, a separate list of the eligible electors who have received absentee voter's ballots must be delivered to the election judges of each such polling place.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 39, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1005. Self-affirmation on return envelope.

The return envelope for an absentee voter's ballot must have printed on its face a self-affirmation substantially in the form provided in section 1-13.5-605 (1).

If applicable, the self-affirmation provided in section 1-13.5-605 (2) may be substituted for the self-affirmation in section 1-13.5-605 (1).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 40, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1006. Manner of absentee voting by paper ballot.

Any eligible elector applying for and receiving an absentee voter's ballot, in casting the ballot, shall make and subscribe to the self-affirmation on the return envelope. The voter shall then mark the ballot. The voter shall fold the ballot so as to conceal the marking, deposit it in the return envelope, and seal the envelope securely. The envelope may be delivered personally or mailed by the voter to the designated election official issuing the ballot. It is permissible for a voter to deliver the ballot to any person of the voter's own choice or to any duly authorized agent of the designated election official for mailing or personal delivery to the designated election official. To be counted, all envelopes containing absentee voter's ballots must be in the hands of the designated election official or an election judge for the local government not later than 7 p.m. on election day.

Upon receipt of an absentee voter's ballot, the designated election official or an election judge shall write or stamp on the envelope containing the ballot the date and hour that the envelope was received and, if the ballot was delivered in person, the name and address of the person delivering the same. The designated election official or election judge shall safely keep and preserve all absentee voter's ballots unopened until the time prescribed for delivery to the judges as provided in section 1-13.5-1008.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 40, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1007. Absentee voters' voting machines - electronic voting systems.

Any local government using voting machines in a local government election may provide one or more machines in the designated election official's office for the use of qualified applicants for absentee voters' ballots. If such machines are provided, they must be available from twelve days prior to the election until the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election. Votes on the machines must be cast and counted in the same manner as votes would be cast and counted on a voting machine in a polling place on election day. The designated election official shall supervise the casting and counting of absentee voters' ballots on the machines. The machines shall remain locked and the tabulation of the votes cast must remain unknown until election day.

Any local government using an electronic voting system may provide such system for the use of qualified applicants for absentee voters' ballots. Such system must be available from twelve days prior to the election until the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election. Votes cast using such system must be cast in the same manner as votes would be cast in a polling place on election day. The designated election official shall supervise the casting and counting of absentee voters' ballots using such system.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 41, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1008. Delivery to judges.

Not later than 8:30 a.m. on the day of any local government election, the designated election official shall deliver to the election judges of one of the polling places of the local government, which polling place shall be selected by the designated election official, all the absentee voters' ballot envelopes received up to that time, in sealed packages. The designated election official shall take a receipt for the packages, together with the list of absentee voters, or, in the designated election official's discretion, the designated election official may elect to deliver the absentee voters' envelopes received from electors and the list of absentee voters to the election judges of the polling place. The designated election official shall continue to deliver any envelopes that are received thereafter during that day up to and including 7 p.m. On the sealed packages must be printed or written, "This package contains . . . (number) absentee voters' ballots." With the envelopes, the designated election official shall deliver to one of the election judges all the books, records, and supplies as are needed for tabulating, recording, and certifying said absentee voters' ballots.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 41, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1009. Casting and counting absentee voters' ballots.

If the self-affirmation on the envelope containing an absentee voter's ballot is properly sworn to, one of the election judges shall tear open the voter's identification envelope in the presence of a majority of the judges without defacing the self-affirmation printed thereon or mutilating the enclosed ballot. One of the election judges shall verify the name of the eligible elector and ballot number issued to such elector and carefully remove the stub from the ballot. The ballot must then be cast and counted in the same manner as if the absentee voter had been present in person; except that one of the judges shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box without unfolding it. The absentee vote must be counted and certified separately from the votes of the polling place where it is counted.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 42, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1010. Challenge of absentee voters' ballots - rejection - record.

The vote of any absentee voter may be challenged in the same manner as other votes are challenged, and the election judges may determine the legality of such ballot. If the challenge is sustained or if the judges determine that the self-affirmation accompanying the absentee voter's ballot is insufficient or that the voter is not an eligible elector, the envelope containing the ballot of the voter shall not be opened, and the judges shall endorse on the back of the envelope the reason for rejection. When it is made to appear to the election judges by sufficient proof that any absentee voter who has marked and forwarded a ballot has died, the envelope containing the ballot of the deceased voter shall not be opened, and the judges shall make proper notation on the back of such envelope. If an absentee voter's envelope contains more than one marked ballot, none of the ballots in that envelope may be counted, and the judges shall note on the envelope the reason that the ballots were not counted. If an absentee voter's envelope does not contain all pages of a ballot, only the marked and returned pages shall be counted. Election judges shall certify in their returns the number of absentee voter's ballots cast and counted and the number of such ballots rejected.

All absentee voters' envelopes, ballot stubs, and absentee voters' ballots rejected by the election judges in accordance with subsection (1) of this section must be returned to the designated election official. All absentee voters' ballots received by the designated election official after 7 p.m. on the day of the election, together with those rejected and returned by the election judges as provided in this section, must remain in the sealed identification envelopes.

If an absentee voter's ballot is not returned or if it is rejected and not counted, the fact shall be noted on the record kept by the designated election official. Such record is open to public inspection under proper regulations.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 42, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1011. Emergency absentee voting - definition.

If an eligible elector is confined in a hospital or at his or her place of residence on election day because of conditions arising after the closing day for absentee voters' ballot applications, he or she may request, by a written statement signed by him or her, that the designated election official send him or her an emergency absentee voter's ballot. The designated election official shall deliver the emergency absentee voter's ballot, with the word "emergency" stamped or written on the stubs of the ballot, at his or her office, during the regular hours of business, to any authorized representative of the elector possessing a written statement from the voter's physician, physician assistant authorized under section 12-240-107 (6), advanced practice registered nurse, or nurse practitioner that the voter will be confined in a hospital or his or her place of residence on election day. The authorized representative shall acknowledge receipt of the emergency absentee voter's ballot with his or her signature, name, and address.

For purposes of this subsection (1), "authorized representative" means a person possessing a written statement from the elector containing the elector's signature, name, and address and requesting that the elector's emergency absentee voter's ballot be given to the authorized person as identified by name and address.

A request for an emergency absentee voter's ballot under this section shall be made, and the ballot shall be returned, to the designated election official's office no later than 7 p.m. on election day.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 42, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 16-158), ch. 204, p. 720, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1642, § 4, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-158, see section 1 of chapter 204, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.